Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IIA.] PROXIES, CONSENTS, AND AUTHORIZATIONS

OF
DOMESTIC STOCK INSURERS

[§431:4-231] Applicability. This part
is applicable to all domestic stock insurers having one hundred or more
stockholders; provided that this part shall not apply to any insurer if
ninety-five per cent or more of its stock is owned or controlled by a parent or
an affiliated insurer and the remaining shares are held by less than five
hundred stockholders. A domestic stock insurer that files with the Securities
and Exchange Commission forms of proxies, consents, and authorizations
complying with the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (Title
15 United States Code section 78a), the Securities and Exchange Acts Amendments
of 1964 (P.L. 88-467), and Regulation X-14 of the Securities and Exchange
Commission adopted thereunder shall be exempt from this part. [L 2000, c 24, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next